Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.10, subdivision 2e, is amended to read: Subd. 2e. Local optional revenue. (a) Local optional revenue for a school district equals the sum of the district's first tier local optional revenue and second tier local optional revenue. a district's first tier local optional revenue equals deleted text begin $300deleted text end new text begin the first tier local optional allowancenew text end times the adjusted pupil units of the district for that school year. A district's second tier local optional revenue equals deleted text begin $424deleted text end new text begin the second tier local optional allowancenew text end times the adjusted pupil units of the district for that school year. new text begin (b) The first tier local optional allowance equals $300 for fiscal years 2025 and 2026, and $550 for fiscal year 2027. For fiscal year 2028 and later, the first tier local optional allowance equals the first tier local optional allowance for the previous year times the ratio of the general education basic formula allowance for the current year to the general education revenue basic formula allowance for the previous school year. The second tier local optional allowance equals $424 for fiscal years 2025 through 2027. For fiscal year 2028 and later, the second tier local optional allowance equals the second tier local optional allowance for the previous year times the ratio of the general education basic formula allowance for the current year to the general education revenue basic formula allowance for the previous school year. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end A district's local optional levy equals the sum of the first tier local optional levy and the second tier local optional levy. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A district's first tier local optional levy equals the district's first tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to new text begin the first tier local optional equalizing factor. For fiscal years 2025 and 2026, the first tier local optional equalizing factor is new text end $880,000.new text begin For fiscal year 2027, a district's first tier local optional equalizing factor is $1,957,000. For fiscal year 2028, a district's first tier local optional equalizing factor is $2,270,000. For fiscal year 2029 and later, a district's first tier local optional equalizing factor is $2,347,000.new text end deleted text begin (d) For fiscal year 2023, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $548,842. For fiscal year 2024, a district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to $510,000. For fiscal year 2025,deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end A district's second tier local optional levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit to new text begin the second tier local optional equalizing factor. For fiscal year 2025, the second tier local optional equalizing factor is new text end $626,450. For fiscal year 2026, deleted text begin a district'sdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end second tier local optional deleted text begin levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit todeleted text end new text begin equalizing factor isnew text end $642,038. For fiscal year 2027 deleted text begin and later, a district'sdeleted text end new text begin , thenew text end second tier local optional deleted text begin levy equals the district's second tier local optional revenue times the lesser of one or the ratio of the district's referendum market value per resident pupil unit todeleted text end new text begin equalizing factor isnew text end $671,345new text begin . For fiscal year 2028, the second tier local optional equalizing factor is $830,000. For fiscal year 2029 and later, the second tier local optional equalizing factor is $940,000new text end . deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The local optional levy must be spread on referendum market value. A district may levy less than the permitted amount. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A district's local optional aid equals its local optional revenue minus its local optional levy. If a district's actual levy for first or second tier local optional revenue is less than its maximum levy limit for that tier, its aid must be proportionately reduced. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for revenue for fiscal year 2027 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GENERAL EDUCATION AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Additional local optional aid. new text end new text begin For additional local optional aid under section 1: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end